Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1360.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Convicted Arsonist Registry Act.Section 2. Findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Following a first arson or related offense, convicted arsonists continue to commit these violent crimes.(2) In an effort to stymie future offenses, a database of convicted arsonists needs to be maintained. Requiring registration will assist in criminal investigation and prevention.(3) The registry should be available to local authorities.12345678910111213141516171819 (4) Other databases, including the sex offender registries, serve to protect the public and the same benefit is expected for an arsonist registry.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Convicted arsonist." An individual who has been:(1) Convicted or adjudicated delinquent for a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a), (c), (d) or (f) (relating to arson and related offenses) or an equivalent offense under Federal law or the law of another jurisdiction.(2) Convicted of an attempt to commit an offense under paragraph (1)."Delinquent child." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions).Section 4. Registration required.(a) Duration of registration.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a convicted arsonist is subject to lifetime registration in the manner prescribed by this section.(2) A convicted arsonist who is a delinquent child is subject to registration in accordance with this act until the convicted arsonist has attained 25 years of age, at which time all records related to the registration of the convicted arsonist shall be destroyed.(b) Information to be provided.--A registration shall consist, at a minimum, of the convicted arsonist's:(1) Name.(2) Social Security number.20250HB1360PN1547 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) All current or intended residences and all information concerning current or intended enrollment as a student.(4) Photographs and fingerprinting in accordance with section 6.(c) Procedure.--(1) A convicted arsonist shall register with the Pennsylvania State Police:(i) within 14 days of release from incarceration;(ii) upon parole from a State or county correctional institution or the commencement of a sentence of intermediate punishment or probation; or(iii) if the conviction occurred in another jurisdiction, within 14 days of arrival in this Commonwealth.(2) A convicted arsonist shall inform the Pennsylvania State Police of:(i) A change of residence or establishment of an additional residence.(ii) A change of institution or location at which the convicted arsonist is enrolled as a student or termination of enrollment.(iii) Enrollment as a student, if the convicted arsonist has not previously provided that information to the Pennsylvania State Police.Section 5. Registration information to local authorities.(a) Duty to provide.--(1) The Pennsylvania State Police shall provide the information obtained under section 4 to the fire chiefs and the chief law enforcement officers of the police departments 20250HB1360PN1547 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the municipalities in which a convicted arsonist will reside or be enrolled as a student.(2) The Pennsylvania State Police shall provide the fire chiefs and the chief law enforcement officers with the address at which a convicted arsonist will reside or be enrolled as a student following the convicted arsonist's release from incarceration, parole or probation.(b) Notice of failure to comply.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall provide notice to the fire chiefs and the chief law enforcement officers of the police departments of the municipalities notified under subsection (a) when a convicted arsonist fails to comply with the registration requirements of this act and request, as appropriate, that the police departments assist in locating and apprehending the convicted arsonist.(c) Additional notice requirement.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall provide notice to the fire chiefs and the chief law enforcement officers of the police departments of the municipalities notified under subsection (a) when the Pennsylvania State Police is in receipt of information indicating the individual will no longer reside or be enrolled as a student in the municipality.Section 6. Photographs and fingerprinting.A convicted arsonist shall register and submit to fingerprinting and photographing as required by this act at approved registration sites. Fingerprinting shall, at a minimum, require submission of a full set of fingerprints. Photographing shall, at a minimum, require submission to photographs of the face and any scars, marks, tattoos or other unique features of the convicted arsonist.20250HB1360PN1547 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7. Penalty.A convicted arsonist who fails to register with the Pennsylvania State Police as required under this act commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 8. Sentencing court information.The sentencing court shall inform a convicted arsonist at the time of sentencing of the provisions of this act. The court shall:(1) Specifically inform the convicted arsonist of the duty to register and provide the information required for each registration.(2) Specifically inform the convicted arsonist of the duty to inform the Pennsylvania State Police within 14 days if the convicted arsonist changes residence, establishes an additional residence or changes the institution or location at which the convicted arsonist is enrolled as a student or terminates enrollment.(3) Specifically inform the convicted arsonist of the duty to inform the Pennsylvania State Police within 14 days of becoming enrolled as a student if the convicted arsonist has not previously provided that information to the Pennsylvania State Police.(4) Order the fingerprints and photographs of the convicted arsonist to be provided to the Pennsylvania State Police upon sentencing.(5) Order the convicted arsonist to sign a form stating that the duty to register under this act has been explained.Section 9. Duties of Pennsylvania State Police.The Pennsylvania State Police shall:(1) Establish and maintain a State registry of convicted 20250HB1360PN1547 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 arsonists.(2) In consultation with the Department of Corrections, the Office of Attorney General and the Pennsylvania Parole Board, promulgate guidelines necessary for the general administration of this act. The guidelines shall establish procedures to allow convicted arsonists to fulfill these requirements at approved registration sites throughout this Commonwealth. The Pennsylvania State Police shall transmit a list of approved registration sites to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and provide a list of approved registration sites in any notice sent to convicted arsonists.(3) Notify, within five days of receiving a convicted arsonist's registration, the fire chief and the chief law enforcement officer of the police department having primary jurisdiction of the municipalities in which the convicted arsonist resides or is enrolled as a student of the fact that the convicted arsonist has been registered with the Pennsylvania State Police under this act.Section 10. Duties of Pennsylvania Parole Board.The Pennsylvania Parole Board shall:(1) Develop a notification form to inform State and county prison and probation and parole personnel how to inform a convicted arsonist of the convicted arsonist's duties under this act.(2) In cooperation with the Department of Corrections and other Commonwealth agencies, obtain the following information regarding a convicted arsonist:(i) Name, including any aliases.(ii) Identifying factors.20250HB1360PN1547 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Anticipated future residence.(iv) Offense history.(v) Photograph of the convicted arsonist.(3) Immediately transmit the information under paragraph (2) to the Pennsylvania State Police for immediate entry into the State registry of convicted arsonists.Section 11. Availability of registration information.The registration information obtained under this act shall not be open to inspection by the public or by any person other than a law enforcement officer, fire chief or individual charged with the investigation of a fire.Section 12. Applicability.This act shall apply to individuals convicted or adjudicated delinquent on or after the effective date of this section for an offense requiring registration under this act.Section 13. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1360PN1547 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617